Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.03
Master Lease Program Trust Fund; created; use; investment.

The Master Lease Program Trust Fund is created. The fund shall consist of lease payments made by state agencies and shall be used to pay any lessor who is a party to any financing agreement sponsored by the Department of Administrative Services. The fund shall be administered by the Accounting Administrator. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. On a monthly basis the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services shall administratively transfer all interest earnings credited to the fund to the Accounting Division Revolving Fund within ten days after the end of each month.

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 23.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.